Virginia statutes. Title 22.1. Education.
Article 5. Selection of School Boards in Cities and Towns Constituting School Divisions.

§ 22.1-48.
Application of article.

The provisions of this article shall be applicable in each city and town which constitutes a school division unless otherwise provided by its charter.

History.

1980, c. 559.

§ 22.1-49.
City school districts.

As used in this article, “district” shall mean a school district. The school board of a city to which the provisions of this article are applicable shall have power, subject to the approval of the governing body of the city, to prescribe the number and boundaries of the school districts; but until such provision is made every such city which is not divided into wards shall constitute a single school district, and in every city which is divided into wards, each ward shall be a school district. The number and boundaries of districts shall be duly reported to the Superintendent of Public Instruction and recorded in his office and also in that of the clerk of the circuit court of the city.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-44; 1980, c. 559.

§ 22.1-50.
Appointment and term generally; vacancies.

The school board of a school division composed of the city or town to which the provisions of this article are applicable shall be appointed by the governing body of such city or town and shall consist of three members for each district in such city or town. However, the school board of a school division composed of any city or town having only one district shall consist of five members. Members shall be appointed for three-year terms except that initial appointments shall be for such terms that the term of one member from each district expires each year. However, the additional two members of the school board of a school division composed of any city or town having only one district shall be appointed for such terms that the terms of one or two members expire each year. The governing body may, by duly adopted ordinance, limit the number of consecutive terms served by school board members. Terms shall commence on July 1. A vacancy occurring on the school board at any time other than by expiration of term shall be filled by the governing body for the unexpired term. Within 30 days preceding July 1 of each year, the governing body shall appoint a successor to each member whose term expires on June 30 of that year, provided the office of that member has not been abolished in redistricting the city or town.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-89; 1959, Ex. Sess., c. 78; 1972, c. 662; 1980, c. 559; 1991, c. 182; 1992, c. 182; 2022, c. 355.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 355 deleted “who are appointed after July 1, 1992” preceding “shall be appointed” in the fourth sentence; and made stylistic changes.

§ 22.1-51.
Repealed by Acts 2016, c. 385, cl. 1, effective March 11, 2016.

Editor’s note.

Former § 22.1-51, pertaining to appointment and terms of school board members in the City of Norfolk, derived from Code 1950, § 22-89.1; 1959, Ex. Sess., c. 78; 1980, c. 559; 2014, cc. 5, 105.